Utah statutes.
34-34-7.   Compelling person to join or not join labor union unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any employer, person, firm, association, corporation, employee, labor union, labor organization or any other type of association, officer or agent of such, or member of same, to compel or force, or to attempt to compel or force, any person to join or refrain from joining any labor union, labor organization or any other type of association.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

